Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.190

Appointment of administrator—Delegation of powers.

The director shall appoint a competent person to administer this chapter. The director shall delegate to an administrator such powers, subject to the authority of the director, as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The administrator will hold office at the pleasure of the director.

[ 1981 c 155 s 18.]